Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.160

Guardianship/conservatorship summary.

Every order appointing a guardian or conservator and every court order approving accounts or reports filed by a guardian or conservator must include a guardianship/conservatorship summary placed directly below the case caption or on a separate cover page in or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665.

[ 2019 c 437 s 132.]